Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-111 Other policy provisions.
No policy provision which is not subject to section 431:10A-105 or section
431:10A-106 shall make a policy, or any portion of the policy, less favorable
in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary than the provisions which are
subject to this part. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next